Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,113
Equity securities insider trading; applicability of sections.

The provisions of sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,109 shall not apply to equity securities of a domestic stock insurance company if such securities shall be registered, or shall be required to be registered, pursuant to section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and a copy of such registration has been filed with the director, if so requested.

Laws 1965, c. 248, § 7, p. 705;

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 8, p. 1309.